Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.110

Reimbursement of physicians and medical staff.

The local board shall make provisions for reimbursing regularly licensed practicing physicians and other medical staff who examine participants making application for membership. Physicians and other medical staff shall perform such services and operations and render all medical aid and care necessary for the recovery and treatment of participants on account of injury, sickness, or disability received while in the performance of duties and shall be paid for these services from the principal fund, but not in excess of the schedule of fees for like services approved by the director of labor and industries under Title 51 RCW. A physician or other medical staff, who is not approved by the local board, shall not receive or be entitled to any compensation from the principal fund as the private or attending physician or other private or attending medical staff of any participant. A person shall not have any right of action against the local board for the negligence of any physician or other medical staff who is reimbursed from the principal fund. Any physician or other medical staff who is reimbursed from the principal fund for providing service or care for a participant shall report his or her findings in writing to the local board and the state board.

[ 1999 c 148 s 10; 1989 c 91 s 13; 1953 c 253 s 6; 1949 c 145 s 1; 1945 c 261 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9578-25. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 2; RRS s 9578-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.